Georgia statutes. TITLE 18 Debtor and Creditor
Article 3 Preferences and Assignments for Benefit of Creditors

Law reviews.

For note suggesting corporations, persons, and firms may execute common-law assignments to allow assignee to carry on and such assignment would preempt creditors attempting to gain preference by judgment, see 10 Ga. B.J. 129 (1947).

For article, “The Problem and the Law of the Insolvent Debtor,” see 16 Ga. B.J. 391 (1954).

18-2-40.
Right of debtor to prefer creditors.

A debtor may prefer one creditor over another; and to that end he may rightfully give a lien by mortgage or other legal means, sell in payment of the debt, or transfer choses in action as collateral security, where the surplus in such cases is not reserved for the debtor’s own benefit.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1955; Code 1868, § 1943; Code 1873, § 1953; Code 1882, § 1953; Civil Code 1895, § 2697; Civil Code 1910, § 3230; Code 1933, § 28-301.

Law reviews.

For note discussing assignments for benefit of creditors, see 12 Ga. L. Rev. 814 (1978).

For article, “Preparing the Georgia Farmer (or Other Small Entrepreneur) for Bankruptcy,” see 22 Ga. St. B.J. 186 (1986).

18-2-41.
Rights of nonmunicipal corporation.

Any corporation, not municipal, may make an assignment for the benefit of creditors; but no such corporation shall be allowed in such assignment to prefer any creditor or class of creditors, except creditors who have debts entitled to priority by law.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 90, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 2698; Civil Code 1910, § 3231; Code 1933, § 28-302.

18-2-42.
Rights of persons and firms.

Persons and firms may make assignments and prefer creditors.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 90, § 2; Civil Code 1895, § 2699; Civil Code 1910, § 3232; Code 1933, § 28-303.

18-2-43.
Execution, filing, and recording deeds of assignment.

In all cases the deed of assignment for the benefit of creditors shall be executed, filed, and recorded as provided for deeds in Code Section 44-2-1.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 90, § 3; Civil Code 1895, § 2700; Civil Code 1910, § 3233; Code 1933, § 28-304.

18-2-44.
Property to be conveyed generally; description of property; attachment of list of creditors of assignor.

All assignments referred to in Code Section 18-2-42 shall convey all of the property of every sort which is claimed or owned by the assignor at the time of the execution thereof. Such assignments shall:

Identify any lands owned or any interest in lands;

Identify goods, wares, and merchandise by general words of description, indicating the location, kind, and quality thereof, with a statement as accurate as possible, containing the purchase price and selling price of the lot as a whole; and

Describe in general terms any shares of capital stock, livestock, or personal property which are not connected with any mercantile or manufacturing business.

The assignor shall attach a list of all creditors with their post office addresses and amounts due to each.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 90, § 4; Civil Code 1895, § 2701; Civil Code 1910, § 3234; Code 1933, § 28-305.

18-2-45.
Conveyances; statements as to aggregate amounts.

Assignments referred to in Code Section 18-2-42 shall convey all books, books of account, choses in action, notes, drafts, bills, judgments, liens, and mortgages held or owned, indicating, as near as may be, the aggregate amount thereof, with a statement as to the total amounts which are considered good, doubtful, or bad.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 90, § 5; Civil Code 1895, § 2702; Civil Code 1910, § 3235; Code 1933, § 28-306.

18-2-46.
Annexation of affidavit to deed of assignment; contents of affidavit.

At the time of signing the deed of assignment provided for in Code Section 18-2-43, the person or firm making an assignment or the officer acting for the corporation making an assignment shall make an affidavit which shall be annexed to such assignment, and which affidavit shall state that:

The assignment conveys all property held, claimed, or owned by the assignor at the time of making the assignment;

All recitals and all estimates of totals and values therein and all list creditors are true to the best of his knowledge and belief;

The debts set out as due to the preferred creditors are bona fide just, due, and unpaid; and

The assignment is not made for the purpose of hindering, delaying, or defrauding creditors.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 90, § 6; Civil Code 1895, § 2703; Civil Code 1910, § 3236; Code 1933, § 28-307.

18-2-47.
List of all property of assignor at time of assignment; affidavits of assignor and assignee as to accuracy of list.

Within 15 days after the recording of the assignment provided for in Code Section 18-2-43, the assignor shall, in connection with the assignee, prepare a full and complete list of all property of every kind, character, and description held, claimed, owned, or possessed by the assignor at the date of making such assignment, to which shall be attached the affidavit of the assignor that the list is true. The assignee shall also attach an affidavit that he has examined the books and other papers of the assignor, that he assisted in the preparation of the list as far as possible, and that to the best of his knowledge, information, and belief the list is correct. If he cannot make such affidavit, he shall state the reason therefor.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 90, § 7; Civil Code 1895, § 2704; Civil Code 1910, § 3237; Code 1933, § 28-308.

18-2-48.
List to remain on file ten days.

The list referred to in Code Section 18-2-47 shall remain on file for ten days in the clerk of the court’s office in the county in which the assignment was filed, subject to examination by any interested person.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 90, § 8; Civil Code 1895, § 2705; Civil Code 1910, § 3238; Code 1933, § 28-309.

18-2-49.
Correcting of mistake in list of assets or creditors.

Where an unintentional mistake or omission has been made in the description of the property, in the list of assets, in the method of preparing the list of assets, or in the list of creditors, the same may be amended upon proof thereof to the court.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 90, § 18; Civil Code 1895, § 2715; Civil Code 1910, § 3248; Code 1933, § 28-319.

18-2-50.
Notification of creditors of filing of assignment; notification of actions attacking assignment; sufficient notice.

Within 30 days after filing the assignment, the assignee shall notify each creditor that the same has been filed. Within 30 days after the date the assignee is served with the complaint attacking the assignment, he shall give notice of the filing of the complaint to each creditor named. Depositing a letter in the post office, stamped and properly addressed, shall be sufficient notice under this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 90, § 17; Civil Code 1895, § 2714; Civil Code 1910, § 3247; Code 1933, § 28-318.

18-2-51.
Foreign assignments to conform with Georgia law.

No property in this state shall pass under any assignment made by corporations, persons, or firms out of this state unless such foreign assignment shall conform to the law of assignments in this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 90, § 9; Civil Code 1895, § 2706; Civil Code 1910, § 3239; Code 1933, § 28-310.

18-2-52.
Providing and filing of bond by assignee; amount of bond.

Upon the request of any three of the creditors of the assignor, the assignee shall make and file a bond with surety, in a sum to be fixed by the judge of the superior court, conditioned for the faithful performance of his trust, which bond shall be made payable to the judge of the probate court of the county and his successors in office, for the benefit of all creditors of the assignor. In no case shall the bond be less than the estimated value of the property assigned.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 90, § 10; Civil Code 1895, § 2707; Civil Code 1910, § 3240; Code 1933, § 28-311.

18-2-53.
Duties of assignee generally; payment of preferred debts after filing.

The assignee shall proceed to carry out the duties imposed upon him by the assignment, but he shall not pay any preferred debt until after 60 days from the filing of the assignment in the clerk of the court’s office in the county in which the assignment was filed.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 90, § 11; Civil Code 1895, § 2708; Civil Code 1910, § 3241; Code 1933, § 28-312.

18-2-54.
Powers and rights of assignee.

The assignee shall succeed to all rights of the assignor but may attack and set aside any fraudulent conveyances or recover property conveyed by the assignor for the purpose of hindering, delaying, or defrauding creditors.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 90, § 12; Civil Code 1895, § 2709; Civil Code 1910, § 3242; Code 1933, § 28-313.

18-2-55.
Nature of actions to set aside assignments generally; priorities and payment to creditors on judgments rendered after filing of complaint to set aside assignment.

No assignment shall be set aside except in a direct action filed for that purpose; and no creditor shall obtain any priority or preference of payment out of the assets assigned on any judgment rendered after the filing of a complaint to set aside the assignment if the assignment is set aside and decreed to be void.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 90, § 13; Civil Code 1895, § 2710; Civil Code 1910, § 3243; Code 1933, § 28-314.

18-2-56.
Parties to actions to set aside assignments.

In all actions to set aside assignments, the assignee and assignor shall be indispensable parties; and any preferred or unpreferred creditor may be made a party plaintiff or defendant at any time in term or vacation.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 90, § 14; Civil Code 1895, § 2711; Civil Code 1910, § 3244; Code 1933, § 28-315.

18-2-57.
Proof required in rendering an assignment void.

When the assignment is attacked as fraudulent or void for any reason, it shall not be necessary to show fraud or collusion or notice thereof in the assignee in order to render the assignment void.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 90, § 15; Civil Code 1895, § 2712; Civil Code 1910, § 3245; Code 1933, § 28-316.

18-2-58.
Judgment not required before action against assignor or assignee.

No creditor shall be required to reduce his debt to judgment before asking equitable relief in any action against the assignor or assignee, or both.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 90, § 16; Civil Code 1895, § 2713; Civil Code 1910, § 3246; Code 1933, § 28-317.

18-2-59.
Appointment of new assignees upon death or removal from jurisdiction of courts of state of sole or surviving assignee.

In all cases of assignments for the benefit of creditors, where the sole or surviving assignee has died or moved beyond the jurisdiction of the courts of the state, the superior courts of this state shall have full power and authority, upon the petition of two or more of the parties interested in such assignment and on such notice as the court shall direct, in a summary manner, to appoint a new assignee or assignees in the place of the deceased or nonresident assignee; and the new assignee shall have all the authority and responsibilities of the deceased or nonresident assignee; and all laws or enactments shall be as applicable and in as full force in respect to the new as to the old assignee; and the court may in its discretion require a bond and security of such assignee.

History.

Ga. L. 1861, p. 32, § 1; Code 1868, § 2296; Code 1873, § 2322; Code 1882, § 2322; Civil Code 1895, § 3166; Civil Code 1910, § 3746; Code 1933, § 28-320.